North Carolina statutes. Chapter 159D. The North Carolina Capital Facilities Financing Act.
Article 2. Private Capital Facilities Finance Act.

§ 159D-35.
Short title.

This Article shall be known, and may be cited, as the “Private Capital Facilities Finance Act.”

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 1; 1998-124, s. 2; 2000-179, s. 2.

Cross References.

As to constitutional provision relating to enactment of general laws dealing with transactions of the type contemplated by this Article, see N.C. Const., Art. V.

Editor’s Note.

Session Laws 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 27 made this Article effective upon certification by the State Board of Elections that an amendment to the North Carolina Constitution authorizing the enactment of general laws dealing with transactions of the type contemplated by the act has been approved by the people of the State. Such an amendment was proposed by Session Laws 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 814. It was adopted by the People at the general election held Nov. 4, 1986, and was certified by the State Board of Elections on Nov. 25, 1986.

This Article was formerly Chapter 115E as rewritten by Session Laws 2000-179, s. 2, and recodified as Article 2 of Chapter 159D. The historical citations to the sections in the former Chapter have been retained in corresponding sections in the Article as rewritten and recodified.

§ 159D-36.
Legislative findings.

It is declared that for the benefit of the people of the State of North Carolina, the increase of their commerce, welfare and prosperity and the improvement of their health and living conditions it is essential that they be given the fullest opportunity to learn and to develop their intellectual capacities; that it is essential for institutions for higher education and institutions for elementary and secondary education within the State to be able to construct and renovate facilities to assist its citizens in achieving the fullest development of their intellectual capacities; and that it is the purpose of this Article to provide a measure of assistance and an alternative method to enable private institutions for higher education and institutions for elementary and secondary education in the State to provide the facilities and the structures that are needed to accomplish the purposes of this Article, all to the public benefit and good, to the extent and in the manner provided in this Article.

It is further declared that this purpose will benefit the people as a way to improve student learning, increase learning opportunities for all students, encourage the use of different and innovative teaching methods, create new professional opportunities for teachers, provide parents and students with expanded choices in the types of educational opportunities that are available, and lower the overall cost of education to the State and to parents and students.

The General Assembly also finds that the private sector often provides services and opportunities to the people of the State of North Carolina in activities that constitute a public purpose, and that these activities by the private sector are to be fostered and encouraged. The people of the State of North Carolina will benefit from the enactment of laws and creation of programs that assist the private sector in obtaining financing for capital improvements of facilities that will be used in conducting these activities.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 2; 1998-124, s. 3; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-37.
Definitions.

As used or referred to in this Article, the following words and terms have the following meanings, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Agency” means the North Carolina Capital Facilities Finance Agency or, should this agency be abolished or otherwise divested of its functions under this Article, the public body succeeding it in its principal functions, or upon which are conferred by law the rights, powers and duties given by this Article to the agency.

(1a)

“Bonds” or “notes” means the revenue bonds or bond anticipation notes, respectively, authorized to be issued by the agency under this Article, including revenue refunding bonds, notwithstanding that they may be secured by a deed of trust or the full faith and credit of a participating institution or any other lawfully pledged security of a participating institution.

“Cost”, as applied to any project or any portion of a project financed under the provisions of this Article, means all or any part of the cost of construction, acquisition, alteration, enlargement, reconstruction and remodeling of a project, including all lands, structures, real or personal property, rights, rights-of-way, franchises, easements and interests acquired or used for or in connection with a project, the cost of demolishing or removing any buildings or structures on land so acquired, including the cost of acquiring any lands to which such buildings or structures may be moved, the cost of all machinery and equipment, financing charges, interest prior to and during construction and, if deemed advisable by the agency, for a period not exceeding two years after the estimated date of completion of construction, the cost of engineering and architectural surveys, plans and specifications, the cost of consulting and legal services and other expenses necessary or incident to determining the feasibility or practicability of constructing or equipping a project, the cost of administrative and other expenses necessary or incident to the construction or acquisition of a project and the financing of the construction or acquisition thereof, including reasonable provision for working capital and a reserve for debt service, and the cost of reimbursing any participating institution for any payments made for any cost described above or the refinancing of any cost described above, including any evidence of indebtedness incurred to finance such cost; provided, however, that no payment shall be reimbursed or any cost or indebtedness be refinanced if such payment was made or such cost or indebtedness was incurred before November 25, 1981.

, (4)Repealed by Session Laws 2000, c. 179. s. 2, effective July 1, 2000.

(4a)

“Institution for elementary and secondary education” means a nonprofit institution within the State of North Carolina authorized by law and engaged or to be engaged in the providing of kindergarten, elementary, or secondary education, or any combination of these.

(5)

“Institution for higher education” means a nonprofit private educational institution within the State of North Carolina authorized by law to provide a program of education beyond the high school level.

(6)

“Participating institution” means an institution for higher education, an institution for elementary and secondary education, or a special purpose institution that, pursuant to the provisions of this Article, undertakes the financing, refinancing, acquiring, constructing, equipping, providing, owning, repairing, maintaining, extending, improving, rehabilitating, renovating, or furnishing of a project or undertakes the refunding or refinancing of obligations or of a deed of trust or a mortgage or of advances as provided in this Article.

(6a)

“Project” means any one or more buildings, structures, equipment, improvements, additions, extensions, enlargements, or other facilities comprising any of the following:

Educational facilities used by an institution for higher education or an institution for elementary and secondary education, including dormitories and other housing facilities, housing facilities for student nurses, dining halls and other food preparation and food service facilities, student unions, administration buildings, academic buildings, libraries, laboratories, research facilities, classrooms, athletic facilities, health care facilities, laundry facilities, and other structures or facilities related to these facilities or required or useful for the instruction of students, the conducting of research, or the operation of the institution.

Student housing facilities to be owned or operated by an owner or operator other than an institution for higher education or an institution for elementary and secondary education.

A special purpose project as defined in

G.S. 159C-3

.

The term “project” includes landscaping, site preparation, furniture, equipment and machinery, and other similar items necessary or convenient for operation of a particular facility in the manner for which its use is intended. The term also includes all appurtenances and incidental facilities, such as headquarters or office facilities, maintenance, storage, or utility facilities, parking facilities, and other facilities related to, required, or useful for the operation of the project or essential or convenient for the orderly conduct of the facility. The term “project” does not include the cost of items that customarily result in a current operating charge, such as books, fuel, or supplies. The term does not include any facility used or to be used for sectarian instruction or as a place of religious worship nor any facility that is used or to be used primarily in connection with any part of the program of a school or department of divinity for any religious denomination.

(6b)

“Special purpose institution” means a for-profit or not-for-profit corporation or similar entity that undertakes any of the activities set forth in sub-subdivisions (6a)b. and (6a)c. of this section.

(7)

“State” means the State of North Carolina.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 3; 1998-124, s. 4; 2000-179, s. 2; 2007-128, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2007-128, s. 2, effective June 27, 2007, rewrote the first four sentences of the last paragraph of subdivision (6a).

OPINIONS OF ATTORNEY GENERAL

A charter school is an “institution for elementary and secondary education”

within the meaning of this section and, therefore, is eligible for financing pursuant to Article 2, Chapter 159D,

G.S. 159D-35

et seq. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Brad Sneeden, Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction, Department of Public Instruction, 2001 N.C. AG LEXIS 37 (10/2/01).

§ 159D-38.
Capital facilities finance agency.

There is created a body politic and corporate to be known as “North Carolina Capital Facilities Finance Agency” which shall be constituted a public agency and an instrumentality of the State for the performance of essential public functions. The agency shall be governed by a board of directors composed of seven members. Two of the members of the board shall be the State Treasurer and the State Auditor, both of whom shall serve ex officio. The remaining directors of the agency shall be residents of the State and shall not hold other public office. The General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint one director in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

, the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one director in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

, and the Governor shall appoint three directors of the agency. The five appointive directors of the agency shall be appointed for staggered four-year terms, two being appointed initially for one year by the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House, respectively, and one for two years, one for three years and one for four years, respectively, as designated by the Governor. Each director shall continue in office until a successor is duly appointed and qualified, except that any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term. Any vacancy in a position held by an appointive member shall be filled by a new appointment made by the officer who originally made the appointment. Any member of the board of directors is eligible for reappointment. Each appointive member of the board of directors may be removed by the Governor for misfeasance, malfeasance or neglect of duty after reasonable notice and a public hearing, unless the notice and hearing are in writing expressly waived. Each appointive member of the board of directors shall take an oath of office to administer the duties of office faithfully and impartially and a record of the oath shall be filed in the office of the Secretary of State. The Governor shall designate from among the members of the board of directors a chair and a vice-chair, whose terms extend to the earlier of either two years or the date of expiration of their then current terms as members of the board of directors of the agency. The board of directors shall elect and appoint and prescribe the duties of a secretary-treasurer and any other officers it considers necessary or advisable, which officers need not be members of the board of directors.

No part of the revenues or assets of the agency shall inure to the benefit of or be distributable to its members or officers or other private persons. The members of the agency shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be entitled to receive, for attendance at meetings of the agency or any committee thereof and for other services for the agency, reimbursement for such actual expenses as may be incurred for travel and subsistence in the performance of official duties and such per diem as is allowed by law for members of other State boards, commissions and committees.

The secretary-treasurer of the agency shall keep a record of the proceedings of the agency and shall be custodian of all books, documents and papers filed with the agency, the minute book or journal of the agency and its official seal. The secretary-treasurer shall have authority to cause copies to be made of all minutes and other records and documents of the agency and to give certificates under the official seal of the agency to the effect that such copies are true copies, and all persons dealing with the agency may rely upon such certificates.

Four members of the board of directors of the agency shall constitute a quorum and the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present at a meeting of the board of directors duly called and held shall be necessary for any action taken by the board of directors of the agency. The board of directors may, however, appoint an executive committee to act on behalf of the board during the period between regular meetings of said board, and said committee shall have full power to act upon the vote of a majority of its members. No vacancy in the membership of the agency impairs the rights of a quorum to exercise all the rights and to perform all the duties of the agency.

The North Carolina Capital Facilities Finance Agency shall be contained within the Department of State Treasurer as if it had been transferred to that department by a Type II transfer as defined in

G.S. 143A-6(b)

.

An individual serving on the board of directors for the agency shall be immune individually from civil liability for monetary damages, except to the extent covered by insurance, for any act or failure to act arising out of that service, except where any of the following apply:

The individual was not acting within the scope of that individual’s official duties.

The individual was not acting in good faith.

The individual committed gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct that resulted in the damages or injury.

The individual derived an improper personal financial benefit, either directly or indirectly, from the transaction.

The individual incurred the liability from the operation of a motor vehicle.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 4; 1995, c. 490, s. 17(a); 2000-179, s. 2; 2018-84, s. 6(b).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2018-84, s. 6(b), effective June 25, 2018, added subsection (f).

§ 159D-39.
General powers.

The agency shall have all of the powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this Article, including all of the following:

To make and execute contracts and agreements necessary or incidental to the exercise of its powers and duties under this Article, including loan agreements and agreements of sale or leases with, mortgages and deeds of trust and conveyances to participating institutions, persons, firms, corporations, governmental agencies and others and including credit enhancement agreements.

To acquire by purchase, lease, gift or otherwise, or to obtain options for the acquisition of any property, real or personal, improved or unimproved, including interests in land in fee or less than fee for any project, upon such terms and at such cost as shall be agreed upon by the owner and the agency.

To arrange or contract with any county, city, town or other political subdivision or instrumentality of the State for the opening or closing of streets or for the furnishing of utility or other services to any project.

To sell, convey, lease as lessor, mortgage, exchange, transfer, grant a deed of trust in, or otherwise dispose of, or to grant options for these purposes with respect to, any real or personal property or interest in property.

To pledge or assign any money, purchase price payments, rents, loan repayments, charges, fees or other revenues, including any federally guaranteed securities and moneys received from them whether the securities are initially acquired by the agency or a participating institution, and any proceeds derived by the agency from sales of property, insurance, condemnation awards or other sources.

To pledge or assign the revenues and receipts from any project and from any loan agreement, agreement of sale, or lease, including any loan repayments, purchase price payments, rent, or other income received under a loan agreement, agreement of sale, or lease.

To borrow money as provided in this Article to carry out and effectuate its corporate purposes and to issue bonds and notes for the purpose of providing funds to pay all or any part of the cost of any project, to lend money to any participating institution for the acquisition of any federally guaranteed securities, and to issue revenue refunding bonds.

To finance, refinance, acquire, construct, equip, provide, operate, own, repair, maintain, extend, improve, rehabilitate, renovate and furnish any project and to pay all or any part of the cost thereof from the proceeds of bonds or notes or from any contribution, gift or donation or other funds available to the agency for this purpose.

To fix, revise, charge and collect or cause to be fixed, revised, charged and collected purchase price payments, rents, loan repayments, fees, rates and charges for the use of, or services rendered by, any project.

To employ fiscal consultants, consulting engineers, architects, attorneys, feasibility consultants, appraisers and any other consultants and employees as may be required in the judgment of the agency and to fix and pay their compensation from funds available to the agency.

To conduct studies and surveys respecting the need for projects and their location, financing and construction.

To apply for, accept, receive and agree to and comply with the terms and conditions governing grants, loans, advances, contributions, interest subsidies and other aid with respect to any project from federal and State agencies or instrumentalities.

To sue and be sued in its own name, plead and be impleaded.

To acquire and enter into commitments to acquire any federally guaranteed security or federally insured mortgage note and to pledge or otherwise use the federally guaranteed security or federally insured mortgage note as the agency considers in its best interest to secure or otherwise provide a source of repayment on any of its bonds or notes issued on behalf of any participating institution to finance or refinance the cost of any project.

To make loans to any participating institution for the cost of a project in accordance with an agreement between the agency and the participating institution.

To make loans to a participating institution to refund outstanding loans, obligations, deeds of trust or advances issued, made or given by the participating institutions for the cost of a project.

To charge and to apportion among participating institutions its administrative costs and expenses incurred in the exercise of its powers and duties conferred by this Article.

To adopt an official seal and alter it at pleasure.

To do all other things necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this Article.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 5; 1998-124, s. 5; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-40.
Criteria and requirements.

In undertaking any project pursuant to this Article, the agency shall be guided by and shall observe the following criteria and requirements listed below. The determination of the agency as to its compliance with these criteria and requirements is conclusive.

No project shall be sold or leased nor any loan made to any participating institution that is not financially responsible and capable of fulfilling its obligations, including its obligations under an agreement of sale or lease or a loan agreement to make purchase price payments, to pay rent, to make loan repayments, to operate, repair and maintain at its own expense the project and to discharge any other responsibilities imposed under the agreement of sale or lease or loan agreement.

Adequate provision shall be made for the payment of the principal of and the interest on the bonds and any necessary reserves for payment and for the operation, repair and maintenance of the project at the expense of the participating institution.

The public facilities, including utilities, and public services necessary for the project will be made available.

The projects shall be operated to serve and benefit the public and there shall be no discrimination against any person based on race, creed, color, or national origin.

In making these determinations, the agency may consider the participating institution’s experience and ratio of current assets to current liabilities; the participating institution’s net worth, earnings trends, and coverage of fixed charges; the nature of the project involved; and any additional security for payment of the bonds and performance of the participating institution’s obligations under the agreement of sale or lease or loan agreement, such as credit enhancement, insurance, guaranties, or property pledged to secure the payment and performance.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 6; 1998-124, s. 6; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-41.
Procedural requirements.

Any participating institution may submit to the agency, and the agency may consider, a proposal for financing a project using forms and following instructions prescribed by the agency. The proposal shall set forth the type and location of the project and may include other information and data respecting the project and the extent to which the project conforms to the criteria and requirements set forth in this Article. The agency may request the applicant to provide additional information and data respecting the project. The agency is authorized to make or cause to be made any investigation, surveys, studies, reports and reviews as in its judgment are necessary and desirable to determine the feasibility and desirability of the project, the extent to which the project will contribute to the health and welfare of the area in which it will be located, the powers, experience, background, financial condition, record of service and capability of the management of the applicant, the extent to which the project otherwise conforms to the criteria and requirements of this Article, and any other factors the agency considers relevant or convenient in carrying out the purposes of this Article.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 7; 1998-124, s. 7; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-42.
Operations of projects; agreements of sale on leases; conveyance of interest in projects.

The agency may sell or lease any project to a participating institution for operation and maintenance or lend money to any participating institution to effectuate the purposes of this Article, under a loan agreement or an agreement of sale or lease in form and substance not inconsistent with this Article. The loan agreement or agreement of sale or lease may include provisions that:

The participating institution shall, at its own expense, operate, repair and maintain the project covered by the agreement.

The purchase price payments to be made under the agreement of sale, the rent payable under the agreement of lease or the loan repayments under the loan agreement shall in the aggregate be not less than an amount sufficient to pay all of the interest, principal and any redemption premium on the bonds or notes issued by the agency to pay the cost of the project sold or leased or with respect to which the loan was made.

The participating institution shall pay all other costs incurred by the agency in connection with the providing of the project covered by any agreement, except costs paid out of the proceeds of bonds or notes or otherwise, including insurance costs, the cost of administering the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or any trust agreement securing, the bonds or notes and the fees and expenses of trustees, paying agents, attorneys, consultants, and others.

The loan agreement or the agreement of sale or lease shall terminate not earlier than the date on which all bonds and all other obligations incurred by the agency in connection with the project covered by the agreement are retired or provision for their retirement is made.

The obligation of the participating institution to make loan repayments or purchase price payments or to pay rent shall not be subject to cancellation, termination or abatement by the participating institution until the bonds have been retired or provision has been made for their retirement.

If the agency has acquired a possessory or ownership interest in any project it has undertaken on behalf of a participating institution, it shall promptly convey, without the payment of any consideration, all its right, title and interest in the project to that participating institution upon the retirement or provision for the retirement of all bonds or notes issued and obligations incurred by the agency in connection with that project.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 8; 1998-124, s. 8; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-43.
Construction contracts.

If the agency determines that the purposes of this Article will be more effectively served, the agency in its discretion may award or cause to be awarded contracts for the construction of any project on behalf of a participating institution upon a negotiated basis as determined by the agency. The agency shall prescribe any bid security requirements and other procedures in connection with the award of the contracts as in its judgment will protect the public interest. The agency may by written contract engage the services of the participating institution in the construction of the project and may provide in the contract that the participating institution, subject to any conditions and requirements consistent with the provisions of this Article prescribed in the contract, may act as an agent of, or an independent contractor for, the agency for the performance of the functions described in the contract including the acquisition of the site and other real property for the project, the preparation of plans, specifications and contract documents, the award of construction and other contracts upon a competitive or negotiated basis, the construction of the project directly by the participating institution, the inspection and supervision of construction, the employment of engineers, architects, builders and other contractors and the provision of money to pay the cost of these functions pending reimbursement by the agency. The contract may provide that the agency may, out of proceeds of bonds or notes, make advances to or reimburse the participating institution for its costs incurred in the performance of these functions, and shall set forth the supporting documents required to be submitted to the agency and the reviews, examinations and audits that are required in connection to assure compliance with the provisions of this Article and the contract.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 9; 1998-124, s. 9; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-44.
Credit of State not pledged.

Bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this Article shall not be secured by a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any political subdivision of the State, or create an indebtedness of the State, or of any political subdivision of the State requiring any voter approval, but shall be payable solely from the revenues and other funds provided for payment. Each bond or note issued under this Article shall contain on its face a statement to the effect that the agency is not obligated to pay it nor the interest on it except from the revenues and other funds pledged for its payment and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any political subdivision of the State is pledged as security for the payment of the principal of or the interest on the bond or note.

Expenses incurred by the agency in carrying out the provisions of this Article may be made payable from funds provided pursuant to, or made available for use under, this Article and no liability shall be incurred by the agency under this Article beyond the extent to which moneys have been so provided.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 10; 2000-179, s. 2.

§ 159D-45.
Bonds and notes.

The agency is authorized to provide for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of bonds, or notes in anticipation of the issuance of bonds, of the agency to carry out and effectuate its corporate purposes. The principal of and the interest on such bonds or notes shall be payable solely from funds provided under this Article for such payment. Any such notes may be made payable from the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or, in the event bond or renewal note proceeds are not available, such notes may be paid from any available revenues or other funds provided therefor. The bonds or notes of each issue shall be dated and may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the agency at such price or prices and upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the agency. The bonds may also be made payable from time to time on demand or tender for purchase by the owner upon such terms and conditions as may be determined by the agency. Any such bonds or notes shall bear interest at such rate or rates (including variable rates) as may be determined by the Local Government Commission with the approval of the agency. Notes shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 10 years from their date or dates and bonds shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 40 years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the agency. The agency shall determine the form and manner of execution of the bonds or notes, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be any bank or trust company within or without the State. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any bonds or notes or coupons attached to them ceases to be that officer before their delivery, the signature or facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if the officer had remained in office until delivery. The agency may also provide for the authentication of the bonds or notes by a trustee or fiscal agent. The bonds or notes may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the agency may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds or notes as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds or notes of any bonds or notes registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds or notes. No bonds or notes may be issued by the agency under this Article unless the issuance thereof is approved by the Local Government Commission.

The agency shall file with the Secretary of the Local Government Commission an application requesting approval of the issuance of the bonds or notes. The application must include any information and documents concerning the proposed financing and prospective borrower, vendee or lessee required by the Secretary.In determining whether a proposed bond or note issue should be approved, the Local Government Commission may consider, in addition to the criteria and requirements in this Article, the effect of the proposed financing upon any scheduled or proposed sale of tax-exempt obligations by the State or any of its agencies or departments or by any unit of local government in the State.The Local Government Commission shall approve the issuance of the bonds or notes if, upon the information and evidence it receives, it finds that the proposed financing will effectuate the purposes of this Article.Upon the filing with the Local Government Commission of a resolution of the agency requesting that its bonds or notes be sold, the bonds or notes may be sold in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price as the Local Government Commission determines to be for the best interests of the agency and to effectuate best the purposes of this Article, as long as the sale is approved by the agency.

The proceeds of any bonds or notes shall be used solely for the purposes for which issued and shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions, if any, as the agency may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or any trust agreement securing, the bonds or notes.

Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the agency may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds, when the bonds have been executed and are available for delivery. The agency may also provide for the replacement of any bonds or notes which become mutilated or are destroyed or lost.

Bonds or notes may be issued under the provisions of this Article without obtaining, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Article, the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau or agency of the State, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions or things specifically required by this Article and the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of, or any trust agreement securing, the bonds or notes.

Before the issuance of bonds pursuant to this Article to finance a project, the Agency shall hold a public hearing with respect to the proposed project and the issuance of the bonds to finance the proposed project. The public hearing may be held at any location designated by the Agency, including at the offices of the Agency in Raleigh, North Carolina.The public hearing may be conducted by the Agency or by a hearing officer designated by the Agency to conduct public hearings. Notice of the public hearing must be published at least once in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the county where the proposed project is to be located not less than 14 days before the public hearing. The notice must describe generally the bonds proposed to be issued and the proposed project, including its general location, and any other information the Agency considers appropriate. A copy of the notice of public hearing must be mailed to the clerk of the Board of Commissioners of the county in which the proposed project is to be located and to the governing body of any city or town in which the proposed project is to be operated.

A county or city that receives an allocation to issue recovery zone facility bonds within the meaning of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Tax Act of 2009 to finance recovery zone property may designate the agency as the governmental entity authorized to issue recovery zone facility bonds.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 11; 2000-179, s. 2; 2009-140, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-140, s. 9, effective June 19, 2009, added subsection (g).

§ 159D-46.
Trust agreement or resolution.

In the discretion of the agency any bonds or notes issued under the provisions of this Article may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the agency and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having the powers of a trust company within or without the State. Such trust agreement or the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or notes may pledge or assign all or any part of the revenues of the agency received pursuant to this Article, including, without limitation, fees, loan repayments, purchase price payments, rents, charges, insurance proceeds, condemnation awards and any other revenues and funds received in connection with any project and may grant a deed of trust or a mortgage on any project. Such trust agreement or resolution may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of any such bonds or notes as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the agency in relation to the purposes to which bond or note proceeds may be applied, the disposition or pledging of the revenues of the agency, including any payments in respect of any federally guaranteed security or any federally insured mortgage note, the duties of the agency with respect to the acquisition, construction, maintenance, repair and operation of any project, the fees, loan repayments, purchase price payments, rents and charges to be fixed and collected in connection therewith, the terms and conditions for the issuance of additional bonds or notes, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. All bonds issued under this Article shall be equally and ratably secured by a pledge, charge, and lien upon revenues provided for in such trust agreement or resolution, without priority by reason of number, or of dates of bonds, execution, or delivery, in accordance with the provisions of this Article and of such trust agreement or resolution; except that the agency may provide in such trust agreement or resolution that bonds issued pursuant thereto shall to the extent and in the manner prescribed in such trust agreement or resolution be subordinated and junior in standing, with respect to the payment of principal and interest and the security thereof, to any other bonds. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the State which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds or notes, revenues or other money hereunder to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the agency. Any such trust agreement or resolution may set off the rights and remedies, including foreclosure of any deed of trust or mortgage, of the holders of any bonds or notes and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by any such holders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the agency considers reasonable and proper for the security of the holders of any bonds or notes. Expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of any project or paid from the revenues pledged or assigned to the payment of the principal of and the interest on bonds or notes or from any other funds available to the agency.

History.

1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c. 794, s. 12; 2000-179, s. 2.